Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 3. Representation.

§ 64.2-714.
Representation; basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this chapter has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this chapter is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation by notifying the trustee or the representative before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in §§

64.2-729

and

64.2-751

, a person who under this chapter may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor’s behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this chapter with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under §

64.2-729

.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-543.01; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-715.
Representation by holder of general testamentary power of appointment.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the holder of a general testamentary power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder may represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-543.02; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-716.
Representation by fiduciaries and parents or other ancestors.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

A conservator or guardian of the estate may represent and bind the estate that such fiduciary controls;

A guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator or guardian of the ward’s estate has not been appointed;

An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

A personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate;

A parent may represent and bind the parent’s minor or unborn child if a guardian of the estate or guardian for the child has not been appointed; and

If a minor or unborn person is not otherwise represented under this section, a grandparent or more remote ancestor may represent and bind that minor or unborn person.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-543.03; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-717.
Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest with respect to the particular question or dispute between the representative and the person represented.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-543.04; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-718.
Appointment of representative.

If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this chapter, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a representative to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

A representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this chapter, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a representative may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual’s family.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-543.05; 2012, c. 614.